Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1347
Unlawful acts; access without authorization; exceeding authorization; penalties.

Any person who intentionally accesses any computer, computer system, computer software, computer network, computer program, or data without authorization and with knowledge that such access was not authorized or who, having accessed any computer, computer system, computer software, computer network, computer program, or data with authorization, knowingly and intentionally exceeds the limits of such authorization shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor. For any second or subsequent offense under this section, such person shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1985, LB 371, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 135, § 9.